Massachusetts, session 194th, H1253.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 32A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 17W the following section:-
Section 17X. The commission shall provide to any active or retired employee of the
commonwealth who is insured under the group insurance commission coverage for excess skin
removal surgical procedures.
SECTION 2. Chapter 118E of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 10W the following section:-
Section 10X. The division shall provide coverage for excess skin removal surgical
procedures.
SECTION 3. Chapter 175 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 47ZZ the following section:-
of 2

Section 47AAA. A policy, contract, agreement, plan or certificate of insurance issued,
delivered or renewed within or without the commonwealth shall provide coverage for excess
skin removal surgical procedures.
SECTION 4. Chapter 176A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 8AAA the following section:-
Section 8BBB. Any contract between a subscriber and a corporation subject to this
chapter, pursuant to an individual or group hospital service plan that is delivered, issued or
renewed within the commonwealth shall provide coverage for excess skin removal surgical
procedures.
SECTION 5. Chapter 176B of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 4AAA the following section:-
4BBB. Any subscription certificate under an individual or group medical service
agreement that is delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth shall provide coverage
for excess skin removal surgical procedures.
SECTION 6. Chapter 176G of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 4SS the following section:-
4TT. An individual or group health maintenance contract that is issued, delivered or
renewed within the commonwealth shall provide coverage for excess skin removal surgical
procedures.
of 2